Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.150

Application of chapter—Exemption for dentists.

This chapter does not apply to practitioners licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW or unlicensed persons supervised by persons licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW.

[ 1991 c 222 s 7.]